Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.40.090

Indebtedness.

The provisions of general law contained in chapter 39.36 RCW relating to municipal indebtedness shall be applicable to code cities.

[ 2001 c 200 s 2; 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 29; 1970 ex.s. c 42 s 16; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.40.090. Cf. 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 141.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective dates and termination dates—Construction—1973 1st ex.s. c 195: See notes following RCW 84.52.043.

Severability—Effective date—1970 ex.s. c 42: See notes following RCW 39.36.015.